Hawaii, session 2026, SB2247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that public confidence in the integrity of state government depends on the assurance that decisions about state contracts are made free from political influence.  When high-level executive branch employees engage in political fundraising, it creates a risk  or the appearance  that governmental authority could be used to reward political supporters rather than being exercised in the public's best interest. The legislature further finds that preventing "pay-to-play" practices, or even the perception of such practices, is essential to preserving the trust of the people of the State in their government. The legislature further finds that this Act is narrowly tailored to apply only to a small and clearly defined group of high-level executive branch employees, those nominated or appointed by the governor to compensated positions subject to senate confirmation, whose position has influence on procurement decisions and contract management.  The mere presence of such officials at political fundraising events may reasonably create an appearance of undue influence or preferential treatment, regardless of their actual intent.  Further, it may send an indirect solicitation signal to contractors, encouraging them to donate to preferred candidates in order to receive governmental contracts. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to prohibit this limited class of employees from attending or participating in political fundraising activities, while preserving their constitutional rights to vote, make personal political contributions, and express political opinions as private citizens. SECTION 2.  Chapter 84, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§84-     Political fundraising; executive branch employees with procurement authority; prohibition.  (a) No executive branch employee who is nominated or appointed by the governor to a compensated position subject to confirmation by the senate, and who exercises authority or significant influence over the solicitation, award, or administration of state contracts, once confirmed and until employment in a covered position ends, shall: (1)  Organize, attend, host, or solicit contributions for any political fundraiser for any candidate for elective office; or (2)  Directly or indirectly solicit campaign contributions from any individual or entity. (b)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an individual from exercising the individual's rights as a citizen to express opinions, make a personal political donation, or cast votes." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.